District of Columbia statutes.
42-3215

Landlord’s lien for rent — When attachment issuable; executing officer’s power of entry.

Such attachment may be issued in any action for the recovery of the possession of the leased premises by the landlord, in which the rent in arrear, or double rent, or both, shall be claimed as aforesaid, and it shall be lawful for any officer to whom the writ of attachment shall be delivered to be executed to break open an outer or inner door when necessary to the execution of the same.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1383, ch. 854, § 1231

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1415.
1973 Ed., § 45-917.